District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-304.01

Specifications.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 401, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1184.1.